District of Columbia statutes.
18-706

International will; effect of certificate.

In the absence of evidence to the contrary, the certificate of the authorized person shall be conclusive of the formal validity of the instrument as a will under this chapter. The absence or irregularity of a certificate shall not affect the formal validity of a will under this chapter.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 102(b), 48 DCR 2087